Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2394.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5458YH (7) 91 ak/ko H.F. 2394 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 135.16E Food bank donations fund 1 ââ appropriations. 2 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 3 requires, ânonprofit food bankâ means an organization organized 4 under chapter 504 and qualifying under section 501(c)(3) of the 5 Internal Revenue Code as an organization exempt from federal 6 income tax under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code 7 that maintains an established operation involving the provision 8 of food or edible commodities or the products thereof on a 9 regular basis to persons in need or to food pantries, soup 10 kitchens, hunger relief centers, or other food or feeding 11 centers that, as an integral part of their normal activities, 12 provide meals or food on a regular basis to persons in need. 13 2. An Iowa food bank donation matching fund is created 14 in the state treasury under the control of the department. 15 There is appropriated from the general fund of the state to 16 the department of health and human services for the fiscal 17 year beginning July 1, 2026, and each fiscal year thereafter, 18 one million dollars, or so much thereof as is necessary, to 19 match the aggregate amount of private donations as reported to 20 the state for tax purposes by nonprofit food banks over the 21 immediately preceding fiscal year. Moneys appropriated to the 22 department under this subsection shall be deposited by the 23 department into the fund. 24 3. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department 25 to be distributed annually to nonprofit food banks pursuant to 26 rules promulgated by the department under chapter 17A. 27 4. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 28 this section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 29 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 30 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 31 close of the succeeding fiscal year. Notwithstanding section 32 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the fund 33 shall be credited to the fund. 34 EXPLANATION 35 -1- LSB 5458YH (7) 91 ak/ko 1/ 2 H.F. 2394 The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 1 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 2 This bill creates the Iowa food bank donation matching 3 fund (fund). Under the bill, the fund is under the control 4 of the department of health and human services (HHS). The 5 general assembly is to appropriate $1 million, or so much as is 6 necessary to match the aggregate amount of private donations 7 to nonprofit food banks over the immediately preceding fiscal 8 year, to the department of health and human services. The 9 moneys shall be appropriated by the general assembly each 10 fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2026, and deposited into the 11 fund by the department. 12 HHS is to annually distribute the moneys to nonprofit food 13 banks and must promulgate rules governing the distribution 14 of moneys from the fund. Notwithstanding Code section 8.33, 15 moneys in the fund that remain unencumbered or unobligated 16 at the close of a fiscal year shall not revert but shall 17 remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated. 18 Notwithstanding Code section 12C.7(2), interest or earnings on 19 moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. 20 -2- LSB 5458YH (7) 91 ak/ko 2/ 2